Florida, session 2026, SB612.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 51 52 Section 1.âPart XIII of chapter 288, Florida Statutes, 53 consisting of ss. 288.9991-288.9998, Florida Statutes, is 54 created and entitled âConstruction Disruption Assistance Act.â 55 Section 2.âSection 288.9991, Florida Statutes, is created 56 to read: 57 288.9991âShort title.âThis part shall be known and may be 58 cited as the âConstruction Disruption Assistance Act.â 59 Section 3.âSection 288.9992, Florida Statutes, is created 60 to read: 61 288.9992âLegislative findings; purpose.âThe Legislature 62 finds and declares that: 63 (1)âProlonged state and local government construction 64 projects that directly block access to small businesses cause 65 significant financial and operational hardships that negatively 66 impact local economies and threaten the livelihoods of business 67 owners and employees. 68 (2)âIt is the purpose of this act to establish a program to 69 provide financial relief, promotional support, and loss coverage 70 to small businesses adversely impacted by state and local 71 government construction projects, ensuring the resilience and 72 viability of affected businesses during essential infrastructure 73 improvements. 74 Section 4.âSection 288.9993, Florida Statutes, is created 75 to read: 76 288.9993âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 77 (1)ââConstruction zoneâ means the immediate area where 78 construction activities directly restrict physical or visual 79 access to a small business, including partial or complete 80 obstruction of entryways, parking, or signage visibility. 81 (2)ââDemonstrable lossâ means a verifiable reduction in 82 revenue, increased operating costs, or property damage directly 83 attributed to state or local government construction activities. 84 (3)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Commerce. 85 (4)ââEligible small businessâ means a business with 50 or 86 fewer employees whose primary access points are obstructed by 87 state or local government construction activities directly 88 adjacent to or in front of the business, as determined by the 89 department. 90 (5)ââProgramâ means the Construction Impact Relief 91 Revolving Loan Program established in s. 288.9995. 92 Section 5.âSection 288.9994, Florida Statutes, is created 93 to read: 94 288.9994âRulemaking authority.âBy October 1, 2026, the 95 department shall adopt rules to implement this part, including, 96 but not limited to, developing guidelines for the award of loans 97 under the program and creating application forms for the 98 program. 99 Section 6.âSection 288.9995, Florida Statutes, is created 100 to read: 101 288.9995âConstruction Impact Relief Revolving Loan 102 Program.â 103 (1)âThe Construction Impact Relief Revolving Loan Program 104 is created within the department. The program may be funded by 105 the Legislature. Under the program, the department shall: 106 (a)âProvide financial assistance to eligible small 107 businesses within construction zones, including low-interest 108 loans of up to $100,000, with interest not to exceed the federal 109 funds rate at the time the loan is issued, for the operating 110 costs of eligible small businesses during construction 111 disruptions. 112 (b)âDevelop a public awareness and marketing campaign to 113 promote the program in partnership with local chambers of 114 commerce and other business organizations and to encourage 115 customer support for small businesses adversely impacted by 116 state and local government construction activities. Such 117 marketing campaign efforts must include, but are not limited to, 118 all of the following: 119 1.âDigital advertising campaigns. 120 2.âSignage and outreach. 121 (2)âAn applicant seeking to obtain financial assistance 122 under paragraph (1)(a) must submit an application to the 123 department. The application must require documentation of 124 demonstrable loss and a plan for the use of funds. Proof of 125 demonstrable loss must include, but is not limited to, all of 126 the following: 127 (a)âDocumentation of reduction in revenue from the start 128 date of the state or local government construction activities to 129 the week before an application is submitted to the department. 130 Such proof may be made by comparing the applicantâs average 131 weekly or monthly revenue of the year before the state or local 132 government construction activities began and the applicantâs 133 current weekly or monthly revenue. 134 (b)âPhoto or video evidence of the obstruction to the 135 applicant due to the construction zone. Such obstruction may 136 include, but is not limited to, any of the following: 137 1.âRestricting parking or primary entry access to the 138 eligible small business. 139 2.âBlocking visibility of the applicantâs premises from all 140 directions of traffic flow along the road and adjoining 141 sidewalks where the applicant is located, during each phase of 142 construction. 143 (3)âAn applicant must agree to accept consultation from the 144 Florida Small Business Development Center Network created in s. 145 288.001 as a condition to participate in the program. If an 146 applicant is enrolled in any other loan program, the business is 147 not eligible to participate in the program. 148 Section 7.âSection 288.9996, Florida Statutes, is created 149 to read: 150 288.9996âPublication on department website; accessibility.â 151 (1)âThe department shall maintain and publish detailed 152 information about the program on its website. The information 153 must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: 154 (a)âA clear description of the application process. 155 (b)âDetailed eligibility criteria for applicants. 156 (c)âThe timeline and procedures for review, approval, and 157 disbursement of funds. 158 (d)âContact information, including e-mail addresses and 159 telephone numbers, applicants or interested parties may use to 160 obtain additional information or assistance. 161 (2)âThe department shall update the information as changes 162 occur and shall ensure that the website is accessible to all 163 potential applicants or interested parties, including those with 164 disabilities, in accordance with applicable state and federal 165 accessibility laws. 166 Section 8.âSection 288.9997, Florida Statutes, is created 167 to read: 168 288.9997âLiability.â 169 (1)âThe department or any of its officers, employees, 170 agents, or contractors may not be held liable in any civil 171 action arising out of or relating to the administration, 172 processing, approval, denial, or disbursement of funds under the 173 program. 174 (2)âAn applicant must acknowledge that, as a condition of 175 applying to the program, submitting an application does not 176 guarantee funding and that the department is not liable for any 177 damages, including, but not limited to, lost profits or business 178 interruptions resulting from the department denying a loan or 179 delaying disbursement of a loan, or from government construction 180 activities. 181 (3)âThis part may not be construed to create a private 182 right of action against the department or any of its officers, 183 employees, agents, or contractors. Eligibility determinations, 184 prioritization of applications, and loan award decisions made in 185 accordance with applicable program rules and guidelines are 186 considered final agency action and are not subject to further 187 judicial review except as provided in s. 120.68. 188 (4)âThe department may adopt rules establishing clear 189 application procedures, evaluation criteria, and dispute 190 resolution processes to ensure consistency and transparency in 191 program administration. 192 Section 9.âSection 288.9998, Florida Statutes, is created 193 to read: 194 288.9998âAnnual reporting requirement.âThe department 195 shall, by November 1 of each year, submit an annual report to 196 the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 197 the House of Representatives which summarizes the performance of 198 the program, including the total number of small businesses and 199 residents served, the total funds disbursed, and the outcomes of 200 the program. 201 Section 10.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.